Illinois, session 104th, HB4145.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Graduate Readiness and Development Act. 6    Section 5. Exit orientation program. 7    (a) The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and 8guidelines for an exit orientation program for grade 11 and 12 9students to prepare the students to enter the workforce, 10obtain marketable skills, or enroll in higher education or 11military service. The rules and guidelines shall include:12        (1) instruction on federal student loans, including 13    the application process and the financial burden created 14    upon graduation;15        (2) instruction on federal and State grant programs 16    for higher education;17        (3) instruction on the availability of local 18    internships and apprenticeships offered by labor union 19    organizations and associations;20        (4) information on any individual microcredential 21    assistance programs, training programs created under the 22    federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, and any 23    other federal or State programs that allow participants to   HB4145- 2 -LRB104 15651 LNS 28822 b1    obtain marketable skills free of charge;2        (5) information on local technical and vocational 3    training providers;4        (6) information on voter registration and the voting 5    process, including the process of voting in a primary 6    election while 17 years of age in limited circumstances;7        (7) information on enlistment in military service;8        (8) information on local employment opportunities;9        (9) information on local programs provided to obtain 10    gainful employment;11        (10) information on local health care clinics and 12    health care facilities, including county departments of 13    public health;14        (11) information on local sexually transmitted disease 15    testing facilities;16        (12) a list of local libraries and information on what 17    free and low-cost services each library offers;18        (13) information on how to open a checking account and 19    a savings account and how to apply for a mortgage; and 20        (14) information on how to open various retirement 21    accounts, the basics of how the retirement accounts work, 22    and how the money in the retirement accounts compounds 23    over time.24    (b) The school board of each school district operating a 25high school shall annually host an exit orientation program 26that complies with the rules and guidelines adopted by the   HB4145- 3 -LRB104 15651 LNS 28822 b1State Board of Education under this Act for all students in 2grade 11 and 12 at each high school operated by the school 3district. The school board shall schedule a high school's exit 4orientation program on one school day during the month of 5September or October. The school board of a school district 6that operates multiple high schools shall endeavor to schedule 7each high school's program on a different school day.8    (c) The school board of each school district operating a 9high school shall permit representatives of labor 10organizations, military branches, workforce training 11providers, vocational training providers, local chambers of 12commerce, banks, and private businesses to present information 13on jobs, training, apprenticeships, internships, jobs 14requiring certification, and related topics to students during 15a high school's exit orientation program.16    (d) The school board of each school district operating a 17high school shall actively participate in planning and 18conducting the exit orientation program of the high school. At 19the exit orientation program, the school board shall present 20information on workforce development programs offered or 21funded by the school board, including training programs 22created under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity 23Act.24    (e) Each Illinois workNet Center shall ensure that the 25exit orientation program of each high school in its local area 26is aligned with the needs and opportunities of the local labor   HB4145- 4 -LRB104 15651 LNS 28822 b1market. The Illinois workNet Center shall provide the school 2board of the school district that operates the high school 3with information on local labor market needs and assist with 4coordinating participation in the program by local chambers of 5commerce, private businesses, and others. The Illinois workNet 6Center shall encourage local chambers of commerce to 7participate.